Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 2. Green Mountain Care

§ 1821.
Purpose.

The purpose of Green Mountain Care is to provide, as a public good, comprehensive, affordable, high-quality, publicly financed health care coverage for all Vermont residents in a seamless and equitable manner regardless of income, assets, health status, or availability of other health coverage. Green Mountain Care shall contain costs by:

providing incentives to residents to avoid preventable health conditions, promote health, and avoid unnecessary emergency room visits;

establishing innovative payment mechanisms to health care professionals, such as global payments;

encouraging the management of health services through the Blueprint for Health; and

reducing unnecessary administrative expenditures.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4.

§ 1822.
Implementation; waiver.

Green Mountain Care shall be implemented 90 days following the last to occur of:

Receipt of a waiver under Section 1332 of the Affordable Care Act pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

Enactment of a law establishing the financing for Green Mountain Care.

Approval by the Green Mountain Care Board of the initial Green Mountain Care benefit package pursuant to

18 V.S.A. § 9375

.

Enactment of the appropriations for the initial Green Mountain Care benefit package proposed by the Green Mountain Care Board pursuant to

18 V.S.A. § 9375

.

A determination by the Green Mountain Care Board, as the result of a detailed and transparent analysis, that each of the following conditions will be met:

Each Vermont resident covered by Green Mountain Care will receive benefits with an actuarial value of 80 percent or greater.

When implemented, Green Mountain Care will not have a negative aggregate impact on Vermont’s economy. This determination shall include an analysis of the impact of implementation on economic growth.

The financing for Green Mountain Care is sustainable. In this analysis, the Board shall consider at least a five-year revenue forecast using the consensus process established in

32 V.S.A. § 305a

, projections of federal and other funds available to support Green Mountain Care, and estimated expenses for Green Mountain Care for an equivalent time period.

Administrative expenses in Vermont’s health care system for which data are available will be reduced below 2011 levels, adjusted for inflation and other factors as necessary to reflect the present value of 2011 dollars at the time of the analysis.

Cost-containment efforts will result in a reduction in the rate of growth in Vermont’s per-capita health care spending without reducing access to necessary care or resulting in excessive wait times for services.

Health care professionals will be reimbursed at levels sufficient to allow Vermont to recruit and retain high-quality health care professionals.

As soon as allowed under federal law, the Secretary of Administration shall seek a waiver to allow the State to suspend operation of the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange and to enable Vermont to receive the appropriate federal fund contribution in lieu of the federal premium tax credits, cost-sharing subsidies, and small business tax credits provided in the Affordable Care Act. The Secretary may seek a waiver from other provisions of the Affordable Care Act as necessary to ensure the operation of Green Mountain Care.

The Green Mountain Care Board’s analysis prepared pursuant to subdivision (a)(5) of this section shall be made available to the General Assembly and the public and shall include:

a complete fiscal projection of revenues and expenses, as described in subdivision (a)(5) of this section, including reserves, if recommended, and other costs in addition to the cost of services, over at least a five-year period for a public-private universal health care system providing benefits with an actuarial value of 80 percent or greater;

the financing plans provided to the General Assembly in January 2013 pursuant to 2011 Acts and Resolves No. 48, Sec. 9;

an analysis of how implementing Green Mountain Care will further the principles of health care reform expressed in

18 V.S.A. § 9371

beyond the reforms established through the Blueprint for Health; and

a comparison of best practices for reducing health care costs in self-funded plans, if available.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4; amended

2011, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 36a, eff. May 16, 2012.

§ 1823.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Agency” means the Agency of Human Services.

“Board” means the Green Mountain Care Board established in 18 V.S.A. chapter 220.

“CHIP funds” means federal funds available under Title XXI of the Social Security Act.

“Chronic care” means health services provided by a health care professional for an established clinical condition that is expected to last a year or more and that requires ongoing clinical management attempting to restore the individual to highest function, minimize the negative effects of the condition, prevent complications related to chronic conditions, engage in advanced care planning, and promote appropriate access to palliative care. Examples of chronic conditions include diabetes, hypertension, cardiovascular disease, cancer, asthma, pulmonary disease, substance abuse, mental condition or psychiatric disability, spinal cord injury, and hyperlipidemia.

“Chronic care management” means a system of coordinated health care interventions and communications for individuals with chronic conditions, including significant patient self-care efforts, systemic supports for licensed health care practitioners and their patients, and a plan of care emphasizing prevention of complications utilizing evidence-based practice guidelines, patient empowerment strategies, and evaluation of clinical, humanistic, and economic outcomes on an ongoing basis with the goal of improving overall health.

“Health care professional” means an individual, partnership, corporation, facility, or institution licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by Vermont law to provide professional health services.

“Health service” means any treatment or procedure delivered by a health care professional to maintain an individual’s physical or mental health or to diagnose or treat an individual’s physical or mental condition, including services ordered by a health care professional, chronic care management, preventive care, wellness services, and medically necessary services to assist in activities of daily living.

“Hospital” shall have the same meaning as in

18 V.S.A. § 1902

and may include hospitals located outside the State.

“Preventive care” means health services provided by health care professionals to identify and treat asymptomatic individuals who have risk factors or preclinical disease, but in whom the disease is not clinically apparent, including immunizations and screening, counseling, treatment, and medication determined by scientific evidence to be effective in preventing or detecting a condition.

“Primary care” means health services provided by health care professionals, including naturopathic physicians licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 81, who are specifically trained for and skilled in first-contact and continuing care for individuals with signs, symptoms, or health concerns, not limited by problem origin, organ system, or diagnosis, and shall include family planning, prenatal care, and mental health and substance abuse treatment.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Human Services.

“Vermont resident” means an individual domiciled in Vermont as evidenced by an intent to maintain a principal dwelling place in Vermont indefinitely and to return to Vermont if temporarily absent, coupled with an act or acts consistent with that intent. An individual shall not be considered to be a Vermont resident if he or she is 18 years of age or older and is claimed as a dependent on the tax return of a resident of another State.

“Wellness services” means health services, programs, or activities that focus on the promotion or maintenance of good health.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4; amended

2011, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. May 2, 2012;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 203.

§ 1824.
Eligibility.

Upon implementation, all Vermont residents shall be eligible for Green Mountain Care, regardless of whether an employer offers health insurance for which they are eligible. The Agency shall establish standards by rule for proof and verification of residency.
(a) (1) Upon implementation, all Vermont residents shall be eligible for Green Mountain Care, regardless of whether an employer offers health insurance for which they are eligible. The Agency shall establish standards by rule for proof and verification of residency.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (C) of this subdivision (2), if an individual is determined to be eligible for Green Mountain Care based on information later found to be false, the Agency shall make reasonable efforts to recover from the individual the amounts expended for his or her care. In addition, if the individual knowingly provided the false information, he or she shall be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than $5,000.00.
(2) (A) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (C) of this subdivision (2), if an individual is determined to be eligible for Green Mountain Care based on information later found to be false, the Agency shall make reasonable efforts to recover from the individual the amounts expended for his or her care. In addition, if the individual knowingly provided the false information, he or she shall be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than $5,000.00.

The Agency shall include information on the Green Mountain Care application to provide notice to applicants of the penalty for knowingly providing false information as established in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2).

An individual determined to be eligible for Green Mountain Care whose health services are paid in whole or in part by Medicaid funds who commits fraud shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 1, subchapter 5 of this title in lieu of the administrative penalty described in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2).

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or restrict prosecutions under any applicable provision of law.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who is not a Vermont resident shall not be eligible for Green Mountain Care.
(3) (A) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who is not a Vermont resident shall not be eligible for Green Mountain Care.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (C) of this subdivision (3), an individual covered under Green Mountain Care shall inform the Agency within 60 days of becoming a resident of another state. An individual who obtains or attempts to obtain health services through Green Mountain Care more than 60 days after becoming a resident of another state shall reimburse the Agency for the amounts expended for his or her care and shall be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than $1,000.00 for a first violation and not more than $2,000.00 for any subsequent violation.

An individual whose health services are paid in whole or in part by Medicaid funds who obtains or attempts to obtain health services through Green Mountain Care more than 60 days after becoming a resident of another state shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 1, subchapter 5 of this title in lieu of the administrative penalty described in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (3).

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or restrict prosecutions under any applicable provision of law.

The Agency shall establish a procedure to enroll residents in Green Mountain Care.

The Agency shall establish by rule a process to allow health care professionals to presume an individual is eligible based on the information provided on a simplified application.
(c) (1) The Agency shall establish by rule a process to allow health care professionals to presume an individual is eligible based on the information provided on a simplified application.

After submission of the application, the Agency shall collect additional information as necessary to determine whether Medicaid, Medicare, CHIP, or other federal funds may be applied toward the cost of the health services provided, but shall provide payment for any health services received by the individual from the time the application is submitted.

If an individual presumed eligible for Green Mountain Care pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection is later determined not to be eligible for the program, the Agency shall make reasonable efforts to recover from the individual the amounts expended for his or her care.

The Agency shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to ensure that Vermont residents who are temporarily out of the State and who intend to return and reside in Vermont remain eligible for Green Mountain Care while outside Vermont.

A nonresident visiting Vermont, or his or her insurer, shall be billed for all services received. The Agency may enter into intergovernmental arrangements or contracts with other states and countries to provide reciprocal coverage for temporary visitors and shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to carry out the purposes of this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4.

§ 1825.
Health benefits.

Green Mountain Care shall include primary care, preventive care, chronic care, acute episodic care, and hospital services and shall include at least the same covered services as those included in the benefit package in effect for the lowest cost Catamount Health plan offered on January 1, 2011.
(a) (1) Green Mountain Care shall include primary care, preventive care, chronic care, acute episodic care, and hospital services and shall include at least the same covered services as those included in the benefit package in effect for the lowest cost Catamount Health plan offered on January 1, 2011.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that Green Mountain Care provide a level of coverage that includes benefits that are actuarially equivalent to at least 87 percent of the full actuarial value of the covered health services.

The Green Mountain Care Board shall consider whether to impose cost-sharing requirements; if so, whether to make the cost-sharing requirements income-sensitized; and the impact of any cost-sharing requirements on an individual’s ability to access care. The Board shall consider waiving any cost-sharing requirement for evidence-based primary and preventive care; for palliative care; and for chronic care for individuals participating in chronic care management and, where circumstances warrant, for individuals with chronic conditions who are not participating in a chronic care management program.

The Green Mountain Care Board established in 18 V.S.A. chapter 220 shall consider whether to include dental, vision, and hearing benefits in the Green Mountain Care benefit package.
(4) (A) The Green Mountain Care Board established in 18 V.S.A. chapter 220 shall consider whether to include dental, vision, and hearing benefits in the Green Mountain Care benefit package.

The Green Mountain Care Board shall consider whether to include long-term care benefits in the Green Mountain Care benefit package.

Green Mountain Care shall not limit coverage of preexisting conditions.

The Green Mountain Care Board shall approve the benefit package and present it to the General Assembly as part of its recommendations for the Green Mountain Care budget.

For individuals eligible for Medicaid or CHIP, the benefit package shall include the benefits required by federal law, as well as any additional benefits provided as part of the Green Mountain Care benefit package.
(b) (1) (A) For individuals eligible for Medicaid or CHIP, the benefit package shall include the benefits required by federal law, as well as any additional benefits provided as part of the Green Mountain Care benefit package.

Upon implementation of Green Mountain Care, the benefit package for individuals eligible for Medicaid or CHIP shall also include any optional Medicaid benefits pursuant to

42 U.S.C. § 1396d

or services covered under the State plan for CHIP as provided in

42 U.S.C. § 1397c

c for which these individuals are eligible on January 1, 2014. Beginning with the second year of Green Mountain Care and going forward, the Green Mountain Care Board may, consistent with federal law, modify these optional benefits, as long as at all times the benefit package for these individuals contains at least the benefits described in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (b)(1).

For children eligible for benefits paid for with Medicaid funds, the benefit package shall include early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment services as defined under federal law.

For individuals eligible for Medicare, the benefit package shall include the benefits provided to these individuals under federal law, as well as any additional benefits provided as part of the Green Mountain Care benefit package.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4.

§ 1826.
Blueprint for Health.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that within five years following the implementation of Green Mountain Care, each individual enrolled in Green Mountain Care will have a primary health care professional who is involved with the Blueprint for Health established in 18 V.S.A. chapter 13.

Consistent with the provisions of 18 V.S.A. chapter 13, if an individual enrolled in Green Mountain Care does not have a medical home through the Blueprint for Health, the individual may choose a primary health care professional who is not participating in the Blueprint to serve as the individual’s primary care point of contact.

The Agency shall determine a method to approve a specialist as a patient’s primary health care professional for the purposes of establishing a medical home or primary care point of contact for the patient. The Agency shall approve a specialist as a patient’s medical home or primary care point of contact on a case-by-case basis and only for a patient who receives the majority of his or her health care from that specialist.

Green Mountain Care shall be integrated with the Blueprint for Health established in 18 V.S.A. chapter 13.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4.

§ 1827.
Administration; enrollment.

The Agency shall, under an open bidding process, solicit bids from and award contracts to public or private entities for administration of certain elements of Green Mountain Care, such as claims administration and provider relations.
(a) (1) The Agency shall, under an open bidding process, solicit bids from and award contracts to public or private entities for administration of certain elements of Green Mountain Care, such as claims administration and provider relations.

The Agency shall ensure that entities awarded contracts pursuant to this subsection do not have a financial incentive to restrict individuals’ access to health services. The Agency may establish performance measures that provide incentives for contractors to provide timely, accurate, transparent, and courteous services to individuals enrolled in Green Mountain Care and to health care professionals.

When considering contract bids pursuant to this subsection, the Agency shall consider the interests of the State relating to the economy, the location of the entity, and the need to maintain and create jobs in Vermont. The Agency may utilize an econometric model to evaluate the net costs of each contract bid.

Nothing in this subchapter shall require an individual with health coverage other than Green Mountain Care to terminate that coverage.

An individual enrolled in Green Mountain Care may elect to maintain supplemental health insurance if the individual so chooses.

Except for cost-sharing, Vermonters shall not be billed any additional amount for health services covered by Green Mountain Care.

[Repealed.]

Green Mountain Care shall be the payer of last resort with respect to any health service that may be covered in whole or in part by any other health benefit plan, including Medicare, private health insurance, retiree health benefits, or federal health benefit plans offered by the military or to federal employees.

The Agency may seek a waiver under Section 1115 of the Social Security Act to include Medicaid and under Section 2107(e)(2)(A) of the Social Security Act to include CHIP in Green Mountain Care. If the Agency is unsuccessful in obtaining one or both of these waivers, Green Mountain Care shall be the secondary payer with respect to any health service that may be covered in whole or in part by Title XIX of the Social Security Act (Medicaid) or Title XXI of the Social Security Act (CHIP), as applicable.

Any prescription drug coverage offered by Green Mountain Care shall be consistent with the standards and procedures applicable to the pharmacy best practices and cost control program established in section 1998 of this title.

Green Mountain Care shall maintain a robust and adequate network of health care professionals located in Vermont or regularly serving Vermont residents, including mental health and substance abuse professionals. The Agency shall contract with outside entities as needed to allow for the appropriate portability of coverage under Green Mountain Care for Vermont residents who are temporarily out of the State.

The Agency shall make available the necessary information, forms, access to eligibility or enrollment systems, and billing procedures to health care professionals to ensure immediate enrollment for individuals in Green Mountain Care at the point of service or treatment.

An individual aggrieved by an adverse decision of the Agency or plan administrator may appeal to the Human Services Board as provided in

3 V.S.A. § 3090

.

The Agency, in collaboration with the Department of Financial Regulation, shall monitor the extent to which residents of other states move to Vermont for the purpose of receiving health services and the impact, positive or negative, of any such migration on Vermont’s health care system and on the State’s economy, and make appropriate recommendations to the General Assembly based on its findings.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4; amended

2013, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. May 27, 2014;

2015, No. 23

, § 55.

§ 1828.
Budget proposal.

The Green Mountain Care Board, in collaboration with the Agencies of Administration and of Human Services, shall be responsible for developing each year a three-year Green Mountain Care budget for proposal to the General Assembly and to the Governor, to be adjusted annually in response to realized revenues and expenditures, that reflects any modifications to the benefit package and includes recommended appropriations, revenue estimates, and necessary modifications to tax rates and other assessments.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4.

§ 1829.
Green Mountain Care Fund.

The Green Mountain Care Fund is established in the State Treasury as a special fund to be the single source to finance health care coverage for Green Mountain Care.

Into the Fund shall be deposited:

transfers or appropriations from the General Fund, authorized by the General Assembly;

if authorized by a waiver from federal law, federal funds for Medicaid, Medicare, and the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange established in chapter 18, subchapter 1 of this title; and

the proceeds from grants, donations, contributions, taxes, and any other sources of revenue as may be provided by statute or by rule.

The Fund shall be administered pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5, except that interest earned on the Fund and any remaining balance shall be retained in the Fund. The Agency shall maintain records indicating the amount of money in the Fund at any time.

All monies received by or generated to the Fund shall be used only for:

the administration and delivery of health services covered by Green Mountain Care as provided in this subchapter; and

expenses related to the duties and operation of the Green Mountain Care Board pursuant to 18 V.S.A. chapter 220.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4.

§ 1830.
Collective bargaining rights.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to limit the ability of collective bargaining units to negotiate for coverage of health services pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 904

or any other provision of law.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4.

§ 1831.
Public process.

The Agency of Human Services shall provide a process for soliciting public input on the Green Mountain Care benefit package on an ongoing basis, including a mechanism by which members of the public may request inclusion of particular benefits or services. The process may include receiving written comments on proposed new or amended rules or holding public hearings or both.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4.

§ 1832.
Rulemaking.

The Secretary of Human Services may adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to carry out the purposes of this subchapter. When establishing rules relating to the Green Mountain Care benefit package, the Secretary shall ensure that the rules are consistent with the benefit package defined by the Green Mountain Care Board pursuant to section 1825 of this title and to 18 V.S.A. chapter 220.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4.